Illinois, session 104th, HB5139.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Video Gaming Act is amended by changing 5Sections 35 and 60 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 40/35)7    Sec. 35. Display of license; confiscation; violation as 8felony. 9    (a) Each video gaming terminal shall be licensed by the 10Board before placement or operation on the premises of a 11licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 12licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 13establishment, or licensed veterans establishment. The license 14of each video gaming terminal shall be maintained at the 15location where the video gaming terminal is operated. Failure 16to do so is a petty offense with a fine not to exceed $100. Any 17licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 18licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 19establishment, or licensed veterans establishment used for the 20conduct of gambling games in violation of this Act shall be 21considered a gambling place in violation of Section 28-3 of 22the Criminal Code of 2012. Every gambling device found in a 23licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment,   HB5139- 2 -LRB104 17388 LNS 30813 b1licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 2establishment, or licensed veterans establishment operating 3gambling games in violation of this Act shall be subject to 4seizure, confiscation, and destruction as provided in Section 528-5 of the Criminal Code of 2012. Any license issued under the 6Liquor Control Act of 1934 to any owner or operator of a 7licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 8licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 9establishment, or licensed veterans establishment that 10operates or permits the operation of a video gaming terminal 11within its establishment in violation of this Act shall be 12immediately revoked. No person may own, operate, have in his 13or her possession or custody or under his or her control, or 14permit to be kept in any place under his or her possession or 15control, any device that awards credits and contains a 16circuit, meter, or switch capable of removing and recording 17the removal of credits when the award of credits is dependent 18upon chance. 19    An applicant or licensee under this Act is not in 20violation of this Act or any of the Board rules under 11 Ill. 21Adm. Code 1800.420 and shall not be subject to disciplinary 22action, delay of any Board consideration, or denial of any 23license for operating a gaming device if operation of the 24gaming device is in compliance with, and not considered 25gambling under, subsection (b) of Section 28-1 or item (iii) 26of subsection (a) of Section 28-2 of the Criminal Code of 2012.   HB5139- 3 -LRB104 17388 LNS 30813 b1Nothing in this Section shall be deemed to prohibit the use of 2a game device only if the game device is used in an activity 3that is not gambling under subsection (b) of Section 28-1 of 4the Criminal Code of 2012. 5    A violation of this Section is a Class 4 felony. All 6devices that are owned, operated, or possessed in violation of 7this Section are hereby declared to be public nuisances and 8shall be subject to seizure, confiscation, and destruction as 9provided in Section 28-5 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 10    The provisions of this Section do not apply to devices or 11electronic video game terminals licensed pursuant to this Act. 12A video gaming terminal operated for amusement only and 13bearing a valid amusement tax sticker shall not be subject to 14this Section until 30 days after the Board establishes that 15the central communications system is functional. 16    (b) (1) The odds of winning each video game shall be posted 17on or near each video gaming terminal. The manner in which the 18odds are calculated and how they are posted shall be 19determined by the Board by rule.20    (2) No video gaming terminal licensed under this Act may 21be played except during the legal hours of operation allowed 22for the consumption of alcoholic beverages at the licensed 23establishment, licensed fraternal establishment, or licensed 24veterans establishment. A licensed establishment, licensed 25fraternal establishment, or licensed veterans establishment 26that violates this subsection is subject to termination of its   HB5139- 4 -LRB104 17388 LNS 30813 b1license by the Board. 2(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 3    (230 ILCS 40/60)4    Sec. 60. Imposition and distribution of tax.5    (a) Through June 30, 2025, a tax of 30% is imposed on net 6terminal income and shall be collected by the Board.7    Of the tax collected under this subsection (a), 8five-sixths shall be deposited into the Capital Projects Fund 9and one-sixth shall be deposited into the Local Government 10Video Gaming Distributive Fund. 11    (b) Beginning on July 1, 2019 and through June 30, 2025, an 12additional tax of 3% is imposed on net terminal income and 13shall be collected by the Board.14    Beginning on July 1, 2020 and through June 30, 2025, an 15additional tax of 1% is imposed on net terminal income and 16shall be collected by the Board.17    Beginning on July 1, 2024 and through June 30, 2025, an 18additional tax of 1% is imposed on net terminal income and 19shall be collected by the Board. 20    The tax collected under this subsection (b) shall be 21deposited into the Capital Projects Fund. 22    (b-5) Beginning on July 1, 2025, a tax of 35% is imposed on 23net terminal income and shall be collected by the Board. 24    Until December 31, 2026, of Of the tax collected under 25this subsection (b-5), 83.7% shall be deposited into the   HB5139- 5 -LRB104 17388 LNS 30813 b1Capital Projects Fund, 14.3% shall be deposited into the Local 2Government Video Gaming Distributive Fund, and 2% shall be 3deposited into the State Gaming Fund. Beginning on January 1, 42027, of the tax collected under this subsection (b-5), 80.84% 5shall be deposited into the Capital Projects Fund, 17.16% 6shall be deposited into the Local Government Video Gaming 7Distributive Fund, and 2% shall be deposited into the State 8Gaming Fund. 9    (c) Revenues generated from the play of video gaming 10terminals shall be deposited by the terminal operator, who is 11responsible for tax payments, in a specially created, separate 12bank account maintained by the video gaming terminal operator 13to allow for electronic fund transfers of moneys for tax 14payment.15    (d) Each licensed establishment, licensed truck stop 16establishment, licensed large truck stop establishment, 17licensed fraternal establishment, and licensed veterans 18establishment shall maintain an adequate video gaming fund, 19with the amount to be determined by the Board.20    (e) The State's percentage of net terminal income shall be 21reported and remitted to the Board within 15 days after the 2215th day of each month and within 15 days after the end of each 23month by the video terminal operator. A video terminal 24operator who falsely reports or fails to report the amount due 25required by this Section is guilty of a Class 4 felony and is 26subject to termination of his or her license by the Board. Each   HB5139- 6 -LRB104 17388 LNS 30813 b1video terminal operator shall keep a record of net terminal 2income in such form as the Board may require. All payments not 3remitted when due shall be paid together with a penalty 4assessment on the unpaid balance at a rate of 1.5% per month. 5(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; 104-2, eff. 6-16-25.) 6    (230 ILCS 40/27 rep.)7    Section 15. The Video Gaming Act is amended by repealing 8Section 27. 9    Section 20. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 10changing Sections 28-1 and 28-2 as follows: 11    (720 ILCS 5/28-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-1)12    Sec. 28-1. Gambling. 13    (a) A person commits gambling when he or she:14        (1) knowingly plays a game of chance or skill for 15    money or other thing of value, unless excepted in 16    subsection (b) of this Section;17        (2) knowingly makes a wager upon the result of any 18    game, contest, or any political nomination, appointment or 19    election;20        (3) knowingly operates, keeps, owns, uses, purchases, 21    exhibits, rents, sells, bargains for the sale or lease of, 22    manufactures or distributes any gambling device;23        (4) contracts to have or give himself or herself or   HB5139- 7 -LRB104 17388 LNS 30813 b1    another the option to buy or sell, or contracts to buy or 2    sell, at a future time, any grain or other commodity 3    whatsoever, or any stock or security of any company, where 4    it is at the time of making such contract intended by both 5    parties thereto that the contract to buy or sell, or the 6    option, whenever exercised, or the contract resulting 7    therefrom, shall be settled, not by the receipt or 8    delivery of such property, but by the payment only of 9    differences in prices thereof; however, the issuance, 10    purchase, sale, exercise, endorsement or guarantee, by or 11    through a person registered with the Secretary of State 12    pursuant to Section 8 of the Illinois Securities Law of 13    1953, or by or through a person exempt from such 14    registration under said Section 8, of a put, call, or 15    other option to buy or sell securities which have been 16    registered with the Secretary of State or which are exempt 17    from such registration under Section 3 of the Illinois 18    Securities Law of 1953 is not gambling within the meaning 19    of this paragraph (4);20        (5) knowingly owns or possesses any book, instrument, 21    or apparatus by means of which bets or wagers have been, or 22    are, recorded or registered, or knowingly possesses any 23    money which he or she has received in the course of a bet 24    or wager;25        (6) knowingly sells pools upon the result of any game 26    or contest of skill or chance, political nomination,   HB5139- 8 -LRB104 17388 LNS 30813 b1    appointment, or election;2        (7) knowingly sets up or promotes any lottery or 3    sells, offers to sell, or transfers any ticket or share 4    for any lottery;5        (8) knowingly sets up or promotes any policy game or 6    sells, offers to sell, or knowingly possesses or transfers 7    any policy ticket, slip, record, document, or other 8    similar device;9        (9) knowingly drafts, prints, or publishes any lottery 10    ticket or share, or any policy ticket, slip, record, 11    document, or similar device, except for such activity 12    related to lotteries, bingo games, and raffles authorized 13    by and conducted in accordance with the laws of Illinois 14    or any other state or foreign government;15        (10) knowingly advertises any lottery or policy game, 16    except for such activity related to lotteries, bingo 17    games, and raffles authorized by and conducted in 18    accordance with the laws of Illinois or any other state;19        (11) knowingly transmits information as to wagers, 20    betting odds, or changes in betting odds by telephone, 21    telegraph, radio, semaphore, or similar means; or 22    knowingly installs or maintains equipment for the 23    transmission or receipt of such information; except that 24    nothing in this subdivision (11) prohibits transmission or 25    receipt of such information for use in news reporting of 26    sporting events or contests; or  HB5139- 9 -LRB104 17388 LNS 30813 b1        (12) knowingly establishes, maintains, or operates an 2    Internet site that permits a person to play a game of 3    chance or skill for money or other thing of value by means 4    of the Internet or to make a wager upon the result of any 5    game, contest, political nomination, appointment, or 6    election by means of the Internet. This item (12) does not 7    apply to activities referenced in items (6), (6.1), (8), 8    (8.1), and (15) of subsection (b) of this Section. 9    (b) Participants in any of the following activities shall 10not be convicted of gambling:11        (1) Agreements to compensate for loss caused by the 12    happening of chance, including, without limitation, 13    contracts of indemnity or guaranty and life or health or 14    accident insurance.15        (2) Offers of prizes, award, or compensation to the 16    actual contestants in any bona fide contest for the 17    determination of skill, speed, strength, or endurance or 18    to the owners of animals or vehicles entered in such 19    contest.20        (3) Pari-mutuel betting as authorized by the law of 21    this State.22        (4) Manufacture of gambling devices, including the 23    acquisition of essential parts therefor and the assembly 24    thereof, for transportation in interstate or foreign 25    commerce to any place outside this State when such 26    transportation is not prohibited by any applicable Federal   HB5139- 10 -LRB104 17388 LNS 30813 b1    law; or the manufacture, distribution, or possession of 2    video gaming terminals, as defined in the Video Gaming 3    Act, by manufacturers, distributors, and terminal 4    operators licensed to do so under the Video Gaming Act.5        (5) The game commonly known as "bingo", when conducted 6    in accordance with the Bingo License and Tax Act.7        (6) Lotteries when conducted by the State of Illinois 8    in accordance with the Illinois Lottery Law. This 9    exemption includes any activity conducted by the 10    Department of Revenue to sell lottery tickets pursuant to 11    the provisions of the Illinois Lottery Law and its rules.12        (6.1) The purchase of lottery tickets through the 13    Internet for a lottery conducted by the State of Illinois 14    under the program established in Section 7.12 of the 15    Illinois Lottery Law. 16        (7) Possession of an antique slot machine that is 17    neither used nor intended to be used in the operation or 18    promotion of any unlawful gambling activity or enterprise. 19    For the purpose of this subparagraph (b)(7), an antique 20    slot machine is one manufactured 25 years ago or earlier.21        (8) Raffles and poker runs when conducted in 22    accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs Act.23        (8.1) The purchase of raffle chances for a raffle 24    conducted in accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs 25    Act. 26        (9) Charitable games when conducted in accordance with   HB5139- 11 -LRB104 17388 LNS 30813 b1    the Charitable Games Act.2        (10) Pull tabs and jar games when conducted under the 3    Illinois Pull Tabs and Jar Games Act.4        (11) Gambling games when authorized by the Illinois 5    Gambling Act.6        (12) Video gaming terminal games at a licensed 7    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 8    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 9    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment when 10    conducted in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 11        (13) Games of skill or chance where money or other 12    things of value can be won but no payment or purchase is 13    required to participate, except where conducted through 14    use of a gambling device or by means of the Internet. 15        (14) Savings promotion raffles authorized under 16    Section 5g of the Illinois Banking Act, Section 7008 of 17    the Savings Bank Act, Section 42.7 of the Illinois Credit 18    Union Act, Section 5136B of the National Bank Act (12 19    U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home Owners' Loan Act (12 20    U.S.C. 1463). 21        (15) Sports wagering when conducted in accordance with 22    the Sports Wagering Act. 23    (c) Sentence.24        (1) Gambling is a Class A misdemeanor. A second or 25    subsequent conviction under subsections (a)(3) through 26    (a)(12), is a Class 4 felony.  HB5139- 12 -LRB104 17388 LNS 30813 b1        (2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection 2    (c), or anything else contained in this Section to the 3    contrary, a gambling offense involving a device described 4    in item (iii) of subsection (a) of Section 28-2 is a Class 5    4 felony. 6    (d) Circumstantial evidence.7    In prosecutions under this Section circumstantial evidence 8shall have the same validity and weight as in any criminal 9prosecution.10(Source: P.A. 101-31, Article 25, Section 25-915, eff. 116-28-19; 101-31, Article 35, Section 35-80, eff. 6-28-19; 12101-109, eff. 7-19-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 13    (720 ILCS 5/28-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-2)14    Sec. 28-2. Definitions. 15    (a) A "gambling device" is: (i) any clock, tape machine, 16slot machine, or other machines or device for the reception of 17money or other thing of value on chance or skill or upon the 18action of which money or other thing of value is staked, 19hazarded, bet, won, or lost; (ii) or any mechanism, furniture, 20fixture, equipment, or other device designed primarily for use 21in a gambling place; or (iii) any vending or other electronic 22machine or device, including, without limitation, a machine or 23device that awards credits and contains a circuit, meter, or 24switch capable of removing and recording the removal of 25credits that offers a person entry into any contest,   HB5139- 13 -LRB104 17388 LNS 30813 b1competition, sweepstakes, scheme, plan, or other selection 2process that involves or is dependent upon an element of 3chance for which the person may receive a gift, award, or other 4item or service of value if that offer is incidental to or 5results from: (A) the purchase of an item or service of value; 6or (B) the purchase or gratuitous receipt of a coupon, 7voucher, certificate, or other similar credit that can be 8redeemed for or applied towards an item or service of value 9from such machine or device or elsewhere. A "gambling device" 10does not include:11        (1) A coin-in-the-slot operated mechanical device 12    played for amusement which rewards the player with the 13    right to replay such mechanical device, which device is so 14    constructed or devised as to make such result of the 15    operation thereof depend in part upon the skill of the 16    player and which returns to the player thereof no money, 17    property, or right to receive money or property.18        (2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection 19    (a), a vending machine Vending machines by which full and 20    adequate return is made for the money invested and in 21    which there is no element of chance or hazard.22        (3) A crane game. For the purposes of this paragraph 23    (3), a "crane game" is an amusement device involving 24    skill, if it rewards the player exclusively with 25    merchandise contained within the amusement device proper 26    and limited to toys, novelties, and prizes other than   HB5139- 14 -LRB104 17388 LNS 30813 b1    currency, each having a wholesale value which is not more 2    than $25.3        (4) A redemption machine. For the purposes of this 4    paragraph (4), a "redemption machine" is a single-player 5    or multi-player amusement device involving a game, the 6    object of which is throwing, rolling, bowling, shooting, 7    placing, or propelling a ball or other object that is 8    either physical or computer generated on a display or with 9    lights into, upon, or against a hole or other target that 10    is either physical or computer generated on a display or 11    with lights, or stopping, by physical, mechanical, or 12    electronic means, a moving object that is either physical 13    or computer generated on a display or with lights into, 14    upon, or against a hole or other target that is either 15    physical or computer generated on a display or with 16    lights, provided that all of the following conditions are 17    met:18            (A) The outcome of the game is predominantly 19        determined by the skill of the player.20            (B) The award of the prize is based solely upon the 21        player's achieving the object of the game or otherwise 22        upon the player's score.23            (C) Only merchandise prizes are awarded.24            (D) The wholesale value of prizes awarded in lieu 25        of tickets or tokens for single play of the device does 26        not exceed $25.  HB5139- 15 -LRB104 17388 LNS 30813 b1            (E) The redemption value of tickets, tokens, and 2        other representations of value, which may be 3        accumulated by players to redeem prizes of greater 4        value, for a single play of the device does not exceed 5        $25.6        (5) Video gaming terminals at a licensed 7    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 8    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 9    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment licensed 10    in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 11    (a-5) "Internet" means an interactive computer service or 12system or an information service, system, or access software 13provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple 14users to a computer server, and includes, but is not limited 15to, an information service, system, or access software 16provider that provides access to a network system commonly 17known as the Internet, or any comparable system or service and 18also includes, but is not limited to, a World Wide Web page, 19newsgroup, message board, mailing list, or chat area on any 20interactive computer service or system or other online 21service.22    (a-6) "Access" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 23Section 17-55.24    (a-7) "Computer" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 25Section 17-0.5. 26    (b) A "lottery" is any scheme or procedure whereby one or   HB5139- 16 -LRB104 17388 LNS 30813 b1more prizes are distributed by chance among persons who have 2paid or promised consideration for a chance to win such 3prizes, whether such scheme or procedure is called a lottery, 4raffle, gift, sale, or some other name, excluding savings 5promotion raffles authorized under Section 5g of the Illinois 6Banking Act, Section 7008 of the Savings Bank Act, Section 742.7 of the Illinois Credit Union Act, Section 5136B of the 8National Bank Act (12 U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home 9Owners' Loan Act (12 U.S.C. 1463).10    (c) A "policy game" is any scheme or procedure whereby a 11person promises or guarantees by any instrument, bill, 12certificate, writing, token, or other device that any 13particular number, character, ticket, or certificate shall in 14the event of any contingency in the nature of a lottery entitle 15the purchaser or holder to receive money, property, or 16evidence of debt.17    (d) It is the intent of item (iii) of subsection (a) of 18this Section to prohibit any mechanism that seeks to avoid 19being considered a gambling device through the use of any 20subterfuge or pretense whatsoever. 21(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 101-87, eff. 1-1-20; 22102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)